Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-266
Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in sections 67-263 to 67-270, upon withdrawal any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which he or she is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the agreement, he or she is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of his or her interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based upon his or her right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 34.